Illinois, session 104th, HB3023.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Neighborhood Freedom from Intimidation Act. 6    Section 5. Legislative intent. All persons within the 7jurisdiction of this State have the right to be free from being 8threatened or intimidated by intentionally threatening 9leafletting or the intentional false reporting of a violent 10crime. The purpose of this Act is to address the rapidly 11growing trend of such intentional threats and intimidation in 12the community, deter future incidents, and give victims the 13recourse needed to recover from their trauma as soon as 14possible. 15    Section 10. Definitions. 16    As used in this Act:17    "Intentional false reporting of a violent crime" means 18intentionally making a claim or report to a peace officer or 19law enforcement agency falsely alleging that another person 20has engaged in violent criminal activity knowing that the 21claim or report is false and reasonably likely to cause an 22emergency response from a peace officer or law enforcement   HB3023 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 10528 JRC 20603 b1agency.2    "Intentionally threatening leafletting" means 3intentionally distributing or depositing any leaflets, 4handbills, flyers, or other materials on another's private 5property, without authorization, with the malicious intent to 6threaten or intimidate another person or group based upon the 7person's or group's actual or perceived race, color, creed, 8religion, ethnicity, ancestry, national origin, citizenship, 9immigration status, sex, sexual orientation, gender, gender 10identity, gender expression, or physical or mental disability. 11    "Malicious intent to threaten or intimidate" means an 12intent to convey a verbal or nonverbal threat, or a 13combination of the 2, which places the owner or an occupant of 14the property, or an owner or occupant's invitee, in reasonable 15fear for owner's, occupant's, or invitee's physical safety or 16the physical safety of the owner's, occupant's, or invitee's 17family members or individuals closely associated with the 18owner, occupant, or invitee. 19    Section 15. Civil action.20    (a) An aggrieved person who has been threatened or 21intimidated by intentionally threatening leafletting may 22initiate a private cause of action against any person, 23persons, or groups of persons however organized who have 24engaged in such conduct to obtain all appropriate relief, 25including injunctive relief, monetary damages, reasonable   HB3023 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 10528 JRC 20603 b1attorney's fees and costs, or any other appropriate relief in 2law or equity.3    (b) An aggrieved person who has been threatened or 4intimidated by the intentional false reporting of a violent 5crime may initiate a private cause of action against any 6person, persons, or groups of persons however organized who 7have engaged in such conduct to obtain all appropriate relief, 8including injunctive relief, monetary damages, reasonable 9attorney's fees and costs, or any other appropriate relief in 10law or equity.11    (c) Speech alone may not support a private cause of action 12brought under this Act, except upon a showing of all of the 13following:14        (1) The speech itself intentionally threatens physical 15    violence against a specific person or group of persons.16        (2) The person or group of persons against whom the 17    threat is directed reasonably fears that, because of the 18    speech, physical violence will be committed against them, 19    their family members, or individuals closely associated 20    with them.21        (3) The person threatening violence intends to place 22    the targeted individual or group, their family members, or 23    individuals closely associated with them in reasonable 24    fear for their physical safety.25        (4) The person threatening violence has the apparent 26    ability to carry out the threat.   HB3023 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 10528 JRC 20603 b1    Section 20. Construction. Nothing in this Act may be 2construed to limit the right to seek other available criminal 3or civil remedies. The remedies in this Act are cumulative, 4not exclusive. 5    Section 25. Severability. The provisions in this Act are 6severable. If any provision of this Act or its application is 7held invalid, that invalidity does not affect other provisions 8or applications that can be given effect without the invalid 9provision or application. 10    Section 30. Constitutionality. The General Assembly does 11not intend, nor does this Act allow, private causes of actions 12to be brought for constitutionally protected activity.